Nebraska, session 109, LB907.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB907 LB907
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Community safe space means any:
(i) Hospital or other facility providing healthcare services;
(ii) School, preschool, or postsecondary educational institution;
(iii) Library;
(iv) Designated disaster or emergency response site;
(v) Courthouse;
(vi) Homeless shelter, rape crisis center, domestic violence
shelter, family justice center, or human trafficking service provider;
(vii) Legal service provider;
(viii) Community resource center;
(ix) Place of religious worship; and
(x) Child care facility;
(b) Judicial officer means:
(i) A judge who is authorized under Article III of the Constitution
of the United States of America; or
(ii) A judge or clerk magistrate described in section 29-812; and
(c) Law enforcement officer means:
(i) A law enforcement officer as defined in section 81-1401;
(ii) A federal law enforcement officer;
(iii) A member of the National Guard on active service by direction
of the Governor during a period of emergency or civil disorder;
(iv) A member of a tribal police department or federal law
enforcement officer duly authorized to assert law enforcement powers by a
tribe in the State of Nebraska; and
(v) Any person acting on behalf of, or in concert with, any law
enforcement officer described in subdivision (1)(c)(i), (ii), (iii), or
(iv) of this section; and
(2) Absent exigent circumstances, an employee or agent of a
community safe space shall not consent to allow a law enforcement officer
to enter a nonpublic area of a community safe space for the purpose of
-2-

LB907 LB907
2026 2026
enforcing immigration law without a warrant described in subsection (3)
of this section.
(3) A law enforcement officer enforcing immigration law shall only
be permitted to enter a nonpublic area of a community safe space:
(a) With a search warrant issued by a judicial officer; or
(b) With an arrest warrant issued by a judicial officer if the law
enforcement agent has actual knowledge that the subject of the arrest
warrant is physically present in the community safe space.
(4) No administrative arrest, search warrant, or removal order
issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security or any other
state or federal agency shall be sufficient to enter a nonpublic area of
a community safe space to enforce immigration law.
(5) Any evidence secured in violation of this section shall be
inadmissible at any trial or evidentiary hearing in this state.
Sec. 2. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-